trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="skuld/er__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~e / ~ene -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>er</l>          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eren</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>         <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="boks__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~e / ~ene; Like bold__n but for lemmas ending in 's' -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="cirk/el__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~el / ~len | (~elen) / ~ler / ~lerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>elen</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lerne</l>     <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kat__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~ten / ~te / ~tene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="spil__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~let / ~ / ~lene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nød__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~den / ~der / ~derne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>den</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>der</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>derne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="abe__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n / ~r / ~rne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rne</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hus__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~e / ~ene; Remember genitive is "hus'". Only to bed used with nouns that end in "s". If not, use skib__n -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vand__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~e / ~ene; Remember genitive is "hus'". Only to bed used with nouns that end in "s". If not, use skib__n -->
  <e a="PT">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tog__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="klub__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~ben / ~ber / ~berne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ben</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ber</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>berne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ateist__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="residens__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er / ~erne; Like ateist__n but for lemmas ending in 's' -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="byfest">          <i>byfest</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="bykerne">         <i>bykerne</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
<e lm="spilleregel">     <i>spillereg</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="formatering">     <i>formatering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="forsamlingshus">  <i>forsamlingshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
<e lm="frakke">          <i>frakke</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
<e lm="hat">             <i>hat</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
<e lm="kanon">           <i>kanon</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="kat">             <i>kat</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
<e lm="kongehus">        <i>kongehus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
<e lm="mægling">         <i>mægling</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="oprindelse">      <i>oprindelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
<e lm="parkeringshus">   <i>parkeringshus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
<e lm="klokkespil">      <i>klokkespil</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
<e lm="flipperspil">     <i>flipperspil</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
<e lm="lystspil">        <i>lystspil</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
<e lm="tildeling">       <i>tildeling</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="træhus">          <i>træhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
<e lm="udmattelse">      <i>udmattelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
<e lm="kantarel" c="domain:natur" a="PT">              <i>kantarel</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
<e lm="kædedans" c="domain:fritid" a="PT">              <i>kædedans</i><par n="boks__n"/></e>
<e lm="storhus" a="PT">              <i>storhus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
<e lm="vognlæs" c="domain:lantliv" a="PT">              <i>vognlæs</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cashewnød" a="DAINF"><i>cashewnø</i><par n="nød__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hasselnød" a="DAINF"><i>hasselnød</i><par n="nød__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jordnød" a="DAINF"><i>jordnød</i><par n="nød__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kokosnød" a="DAINF"><i>kokosnød</i><par n="nød__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oprindelsesland" a="DAINF"><i>oprindelsesland</i><par n="vand__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pistacienød" a="DAINF"><i>pistacienø</i><par n="nød__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skrab" a="DAINF"><i>skrab</i><par n="vand__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skvulp" a="DAINF"><i>skvulp</i><par n="vand__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skulder" a="MLO"><i>skulder</i><par n="skuld/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="advarsel">        <i>advars</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="essens" a="PT">              <i>es</i><par n="boks__n"/></e>
<e lm="bankboks">        <i>bankboks</i><par n="boks__n"/></e>
<e lm="sats" c="toldsats"><i>sats</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="bi">              <i>bi</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
<e lm="boghandel">       <i>boghand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="dans">            <i>dans</i><par n="boks__n"/></e>
<e lm="diskette">        <i>diskette</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
<e lm="essens">          <i>essens</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="fodboldklub">     <i>fodboldklub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="golfklub">        <i>golfklub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="ha">              <i>ha</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
<e lm="handel">          <i>hand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="heltal">          <i>heltal</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
<e lm="håndskrift">      <i>håndskrift</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="is">              <i>is</i><par n="boks__n"/></e>
<e lm="klub">            <i>klub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="kongres">         <i>kongres</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="lod">             <i>lod</i><par n="nød__n"/></e>
<e lm="motorcykel">      <i>motorcyk</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="mus">             <i>mus</i><par n="boks__n"/></e>
<e lm="natklub">         <i>natklub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="plads">           <i>plads</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="pub">             <i>pub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="pølse">           <i>pølse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
<e lm="sadel">           <i>sad</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="skat">            <i>skat</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
<e lm="struds">          <i>struds</i><par n="boks__n"/></e>
<e lm="stub">            <i>stub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="tal">             <i>tal</i><par n="spil__n"/></e>
<e lm="tinghus">         <i>tinghus</i><par n="hus__n"/></e>
<e lm="tog">             <i>tog</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
<e lm="pendultog">       <i>pendultog</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
<e lm="vits">            <i>vits</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="æsel">            <i>æs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
